Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2942
Voting by investor members.

If the articles of organization or bylaws provide for investor members, each investor member has one vote except as otherwise provided by the articles of organization or bylaws.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 42.